Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-627
Intersection, defined.

Intersection shall mean the area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines or, if there are no lateral curb lines, the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two or more highways which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict. When a highway includes two roadways thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection. In the event such intersecting highway also includes two roadways thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of two roadways of such highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection. The junction of an alley with a highway shall not constitute an intersection.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 123.

Intersection right-of-way is a qualified, not absolute, right to proceed, exercising due care, in a lawful manner in preference to an opposing vehicle. Reese v. Mayer, 198 Neb. 499, 253 N.W.2d 317 (1977).